New York, session 2025-2026, A5127.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6526 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 11 to read as follows: 3 11. Any person in a declared state of disaster emergency for a disease 4 outbreak or epidemic, pursuant to section twenty-eight of the executive 5 law, shall be permitted, upon the successful completion of training 6 deemed adequate by the commissioner, to collect throat or nasopharyngeal 7 swab specimens from individuals suspected of being infected by an infec- 8 tious disease, for purposes of testing. The commissioner, in consulta- 9 tion with the commissioner of health, shall establish training require- 10 ments for unlicensed individuals to collect throat or nasopharyngeal 11 swab specimens. 12 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 6908 of the education law is amended by 13 adding a new paragraph i to read as follows: 14 i. As prohibiting in a declared state of disaster emergency for a 15 disease outbreak or epidemic, pursuant to section twenty-eight of the 16 executive law, to the extent necessary, non-nursing staff, upon the 17 successful completion of training deemed adequate by the commissioner, 18 to perform tasks, under the supervision of a nurse, otherwise limited to 19 the scope of practice of a licensed or registered nurse. The commis- 20 sioner, in consultation with the commissioner of health, shall establish 21 training requirements for non-nursing staff to perform the tasks permit- 22 ted by this paragraph. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07892-01-5